Vermont, session 2025-2026, H784.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 118 is added to read:
VT LEG #386239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.784
2026 Page 2 of 15
CHAPTER 118. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
Subchapter 1. Chatbots
§ 4193a. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Advertisement” means any written or oral statement, illustration, or
depiction that promotes the sale or use of a good or service or is designed to
increase interest in a brand, good, or service where such statement, illustration,
or depiction is displayed in exchange for monetary or other valuable
consideration, including access to data between the chatbot provider and the
brand, good, or service.
(2)(A) “Affirmative consent” means a clear, affirmative act signifying a
user’s freely given, specific, informed, and unambiguous authorization for an
act or practice in response to a specific request from a chatbot provider,
provided:
(i) the request is provided to the user in a clear and conspicuous
standalone disclosure;
(ii) the request includes a description, written in easy-to-
understand language, of the act or practice for which the user’s consent is
sought;
(iii) the request is made in a manner reasonably accessible to and
usable by users with disabilities;
VT LEG #386239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.784
2026 Page 3 of 15
(iv) the request is made available to the user in each language in
which the chatbot provider provides a chatbot;
(v) the option to refuse to give consent is at least as prominent as
the option to give consent, and the option to refuse to give consent takes the
same number of steps as or fewer than the option to give consent; and
(vi) affirmative consent to an act or practice is not inferred from
the inaction of the user or the user’s continued use of a chatbot provided by the
chatbot provider.
(B) “Affirmative consent” does not include:
(i) acceptance of general or broad terms of use or a similar
document;
(ii) hovering over, muting, pausing, or closing a given piece of
content;
(iii) agreement obtained through the use of a false, fraudulent, or
materially misleading statement or representation; or
(iv) agreement obtained through the use of other dark patterns.
(3) “Chat log” means any input data, outputs generated by a chatbot, or
record of the input data or outputs from user interactions with a chatbot.
(4) “Chatbot” means any artificial intelligence, algorithmic, or
automated system that generates information via text, audio, image, or video in
a manner that simulates interpersonal interactions or conversation.
VT LEG #386239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.784
2026 Page 4 of 15
(5) “Chatbot provider” means any person creating, distributing, or
otherwise making available a chatbot.
(6) “Collect” or “collecting” means creating, buying, renting, gathering,
obtaining, receiving, accessing, or otherwise acquiring personal data or input
data by any means through individuals’ use of chatbots.
(7) “Dark pattern” means a user interface designed or manipulated with
the substantial effect of subverting or impairing user autonomy, decision
making, or choice, and includes any practice the Federal Trade Commission
refers to as a dark pattern.
(8) “Deidentified data” means information that cannot reasonably be
used to infer or derive the identity of an individual or does not identify and is
not linked or reasonably linkable to an individual or a device that identifies or
is linked or reasonably linkable to such individual, regardless of whether the
information is aggregated, provided that the chatbot provider:
(A) takes such physical, administrative, and technical measures as are
necessary to ensure that the information cannot, at any point, be used to
reidentify any individual or device that identifies or is linked or reasonably
linkable to one or more individuals;
(B) publicly commits in a clear and conspicuous manner to:
(i) process, retain, or transfer the information solely in a
deidentified form without any reasonable means for reidentification; and
VT LEG #386239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.784
2026 Page 5 of 15
(ii) not attempt to reidentify the information with any individual or
device that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to an individual; and
(C) contractually obligates any entity that receives the information
from the chatbot provider to:
(i) comply with all of the provisions of this subdivision (8) with
respect to the information; and
(ii) require that such contractual obligations be included in all
subsequent instances in which the data may be received.
(9) “Input data” means information, including text, photos, audio, video,
or files, provided to a chatbot by a user.
(10) “Model” means an engineered or machine-based system underlying
a chatbot that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it
receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual
environments.
(11)(A) “Personal data” means any information, including derived data,
inferences, or unique identifiers, that is linked or reasonably linkable, alone or
in combination with other information, to an identified or identifiable
individual or a device that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to an
individual.
(B) “Personal data” does not include deidentified data or publicly
available information.
VT LEG #386239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.784
2026 Page 6 of 15
(12) “Process” or “processing” means any operation or set of operations
performed, whether by manual or automated means, on personal data or input
data or on sets of personal data or input data, such as the use, storage,
disclosure, analysis, deletion, or modification of such data.
(13)(A) “Profiling” means any form of processing performed on input
data or personal data to detect and classify or designate personality and
behavioral characteristics of an individual.
(B) “Profiling” does not include processing of chat logs for purposes
of user safety or to otherwise comply with this subchapter.
(14)(A) “Publicly available information” means information that has
been lawfully made available to the general public from:
(i) federal, state, or municipal government records, provided the
information is collected, processed, and transferred in accordance with
restrictions or terms of use placed on the information by the relevant
government entity;
(ii) widely distributed media; or
(iii) a disclosure to the general public as required by federal, state,
or local law.
(B) “Publicly available information” does not include:
(i) any obscene visual depiction, as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 1460;
(ii) biometric data;
VT LEG #386239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.784
2026 Page 7 of 15
(iii) personal data that is created through the combination of
personal data with publicly available information;
(iv) information that is collated and combined to create user
profiles on publicly available or subscription-based websites and inferences
generated from such information;
(v) genetic data, unless otherwise made publicly available by the
individual to whom the information pertains;
(vi) information made available by a user on a website or online
service made available to all members of the public, for free or for a fee, where
the user has restricted the information to a specific audience; or
(vii) intimate images, authentic or computer generated, known to
be nonconsensual.
(15)(A) “Sell” means exchanging personal data or input data for
monetary or other valuable consideration or making available such data or use
of such data by the chatbot provider to a third party.
(B) “Sell” does not include:
(i) the disclosure of personal data or input data to a third party that
processes the data on behalf of the chatbot provider;
(ii) with the user’s affirmative consent, the disclosure of personal
data or input data where the user affirmatively directs the chatbot provider to
VT LEG #386239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.784
2026 Page 8 of 15
disclose the data or intentionally uses the chatbot provider to interact with a
third party; or
(iii) the disclosure of personal data that the user:
(I) intentionally made available to the general public via a
channel of mass media; and
(II) did not restrict to a specific audience.
(16) “Training” means the use of input data to adjust or modify a model.
“Training” does not include:
(A) testing to identify risks of harm to users;
(B) adjustments or modifications to address identified risks of harm
to users; or
(C) any actions necessary to comply with this subchapter or
otherwise required by law.
(17) “User” means any individual, regardless of age.
(18)(A) “Widely distributed media” means information that is available
to the general public, including information from a telephone book or online
directory; a television, internet, or radio program; the news media; or an
internet site that is available to the general public on an unrestricted basis.
(B) “Widely distributed media” does not include an obscene visual
depiction, as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 1460.
VT LEG #386239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.784
2026 Page 9 of 15
§ 4193b. DATA PRIVACY AND SECURITY
(a) Prohibitions. A chatbot provider shall not:
(1) process personal data other than input data to inform chatbot outputs
unless the processing of personal data is necessary to fulfill an express request
made by a user and that user has provided affirmative consent;
(2) process a user’s chat log to:
(A) determine whether to display an advertisement for a product or
service to the user;
(B) determine a product, service, or category of product or service to
advertise to the user; or
(C) customize an advertisement or how an advertisement is presented
to the user;
(3) process a user’s chat log or personal data:
(A) if the chatbot provider knows or should have known, based on
knowledge fairly implied on the basis of objective circumstances, that the user
is under 18 years of age without the affirmative consent of that user’s parent or
legal guardian;
(B) for training purposes, if the chatbot provider knows or should
have known, based on knowledge fairly implied on the basis of objective
circumstances, that a user is under 18 years of age;
VT LEG #386239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.784
2026 Page 10 of 15
(C) of a user over 18 years of age for training purposes, unless the
chatbot provider first obtains affirmative consent; or
(D) to engage in profiling beyond what is necessary to fulfill an
express request from the user;
(4) use any classification or designation of a user’s personality or
behavioral characteristics created through profiling beyond what is necessary
to fulfill an express request made by the user;
(5) sell a user’s chat logs;
(6) retain a user’s chat log for longer than 10 years, unless retention is
necessary to comply with this subchapter or otherwise required by law;
(7) discriminate or retaliate against any user, including by denying
products or services, charging different prices or rates for products or services,
or providing lower-quality products or services to the user, for refusing to
consent to the use of chat logs or personal data for training purposes; or
(8) represent to a user that the user’s input data or chat log is
confidential.
(b) Right to access. A user has the right to access, in a portable and readily
usable format and at any time, any of the user’s own chat logs that a chatbot
provider has retained.
(1) Chat logs must be made available to users in a downloadable and
human- and machine-readable format.
VT LEG #386239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.784
2026 Page 11 of 15
(2) A chatbot provider shall not discriminate or retaliate against any
user, including by denying products or services, charging different prices or
rates for products or services, or providing lower-quality products or services
to the user, for accessing their own chat logs.
(c) Compelling production. A public agency, as that term is defined in 1
V.S.A. § 317, shall not compel the production of or access to input data or chat
logs from a chatbot provider without a duly issued wiretap warrant pursuant to
13 V.S.A. chapter 232 (Vermont Electronic Communication Privacy Act).
(d) Data security program. A chatbot provider shall develop, implement,
and maintain a comprehensive data security program that contains
administrative, technical, and physical safeguards that are proportionate to the
volume and nature of the personal data and chat logs maintained by the chatbot
provider. The program shall be written and made publicly available on the
chatbot provider’s website.
§ 4193c. TRANSPARENCY
(a) Licensed professionals.
(1) A chatbot provider shall not use any term, letter, or phrase in the
advertising, interface, or outputs of a chatbot that indicates or implies that any
output data is being provided by or endorsed by or is equivalent to that
provided by:
VT LEG #386239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.784
2026 Page 12 of 15
(A) a licensed health care professional;
(B) a licensed legal professional;
(C) a licensed accounting professional;
(D) a certified financial fiduciary or planner; or
(E) any licensed or certified professional regulated by the Office of
Professional Regulation.
(2) A violation of subdivision (1) of this subsection is an unfair and
deceptive and act in commerce, subject to enforcement and penalties as
provided in this subchapter.
(b) Disclosure. Chatbot providers shall provide clear, conspicuous, and
explicit notice to users that users are interacting with a chatbot rather than a
human prior to the chatbot generating any outputs, every hour thereafter, and
each time a user prompts the chatbot about whether it is a real person subject to
the following:
(1) The text of this notice must appear in the same language as the one
in which the user is interacting with the chatbot, in a font size easily readable
by an average user, and no smaller than the largest font size of other text
appearing on the interface on which the chatbot is provided.
(2) This notice must be accessible to users with disabilities.
(3) This notice must comply with rules adopted by the Attorney General
pursuant to this subchapter.
VT LEG #386239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.784
2026 Page 13 of 15
(c) Risk assessment. A chatbot provider shall on a monthly basis,
according to metrics as set forth in rules adopted by the Attorney General
pursuant to this subchapter, assess its chatbot for risks of harm to users and
actively mitigate any risks of harm.
(d) Chatbot information. A chatbot provider shall make information about
its chatbot publicly available on its website on a monthly basis as set forth in
rules adopted by the Attorney General pursuant to this subchapter.
§ 4193d. RULEMAKING
(a) The Attorney General shall adopt rules:
(1) describing the form and content of the disclosures and providing an
example template for the disclosures required pursuant to subsection 4193c(b)
of this subchapter;
(2) describing risks of harm to users and the metrics that each chatbot
provider shall use to assess its chatbots for these risks of harm to users
pursuant to subsection 4193c(c) of this subchapter; and
(3) identifying and describing categories of information that each
chatbot provider must make publicly available about its chatbots pursuant to
subsection 4193c(d) of this subchapter.
(b) The Attorney General may adopt other rules as necessary to implement
the provisions of this subchapter.
VT LEG #386239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.784
2026 Page 14 of 15
§ 4193e. LIABILITY
(a) A chatbot is a product for the purposes of product liability actions.
(b) A chatbot provider has a duty to ensure that the use of its chatbot does
not cause injury to a user.
(c) A chatbot provider is liable for any injury it caused a user through the
use of its chatbot, even if:
(1) the chatbot provider exercised all reasonable care in the design and
distribution of the chatbot; or
(2) the chatbot provider did not directly distribute the chatbot to the user
or otherwise enter into a contractual relationship with the user.
(d) Nothing in this subchapter preempts or otherwise affects any right,
claim, remedy, presumption, or defense available at law or in equity, including
antidiscrimination, consumer protection, labor, and civil rights laws.
§ 4193f. ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY
(a) The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may bring a civil action
against a chatbot provider that violates this subchapter to:
(1) enjoin an act or practice that is in violation;
(2) enforce compliance with this subchapter or a rule adopted pursuant
to this subchapter;
(3) obtain damages, civil penalties, restitution, or other remedies on
behalf of the residents of the State; and
VT LEG #386239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.784
2026 Page 15 of 15
(4) obtain reasonable attorney’s fees and other litigation costs
reasonably incurred.
(b) A violation of section 4193b of this subchapter or subsection 4193c(a)
or 4193c(b) of this subchapter constitutes an injury in fact to a user.
(c) A user injured pursuant to subsection (b) of this section may bring an
action in Superior Court against the chatbot provider, in which the court may
issue an award to the user for:
(1) liquidated damages of:
(A) $5,000.00 per violation for any violation of section 4193b of this
subchapter, or actual damages, whichever is greater; and
(B) $5,000.00 in total for all violations of subsection 4193c(a) or
4193c(b) of this subchapter, or actual damages, whichever is greater;
(2) punitive damages, for reckless and knowing violations;
(3) injunctive relief;
(4) declaratory relief; and
(5) reasonable attorney’s fees and litigation costs.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386239 v.1